North Carolina, session 2025, SB941.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 131E-184 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(i) The Department shall exempt from review any new institutional health service
established, developed, or acquired by any entity working in partnership or conjunction with the
Department of State Treasurer."
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
State Treasurer the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to take any actions permitted by the changes implemented in this act.
SECTION 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
*S941-v-1*